src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-CLASS_AW_STEM_1_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - sg̲áw - ENGLISH : # CLASS_AW_STEM_1

     sg̲áw+V+Sg+Impv: sg̲áw
     sg̲áw+V+Imm+Pres: sg̲áwga
     sg̲áw+V+Interr+Simp+Pres: sg̲áw
     sg̲áw+V+Simp+Pres: sg̲áwgang
     sg̲áw+V+Dir+Past: sg̲áwgan
     sg̲áw+V+Rel: sg̲áws
     sg̲áw+V+NonFact: sg̲áwang
     sg̲áw+V+Interr+Pres+Hab: sg̲áwgang
     sg̲áw+V+Pres+Hab: sg̲áwganggang
     sg̲áw+V+Pres+Hab+NonFact: sg̲áwgangang
     sg̲áw+V+Dir+Past+Hab: sg̲áwgiinii
     sg̲áw+V+Interr+Past+Hab: sg̲áwgaangaa
     sg̲áw+V+Indir+Past+Hab: sg̲áwgaangaan
     sg̲áw+V+Interr+Fut+Long: sg̲áwäsaa
     sg̲áw+V+Interr+Fut+Short: sg̲áwäs
     sg̲áw+V+Simp+Fut: sg̲áwäsaang
     sg̲áw+V+Imm+Fut: sg̲áwäsga
     sg̲áw+V+Rel+Fut: sg̲áwäsaas
     sg̲áw+V+Fut+NonFact: sg̲áwäsaa.ang
     sg̲áw+V+Interr+Near+Fut: sg̲áwang k̲asaʼáa
     sg̲áw+V+Near+Fut: sg̲áwang k̲asaʼáang
     sg̲áw+V+Interr+VNear+Fut: sg̲áwang k̲asaasdláa
     sg̲áw+V+VNear+Fut: sg̲áwang k̲asaasdláang
     sg̲áw+V+Bias+Imm+Pres: sg̲áwʼuuj
     sg̲áw+V+Bias+Simp+Pres: sg̲áwʼuujang
     sg̲áw+V+Res: sg̲áwäsaaʼuujang
     sg̲áw+V+Bias+Interr+Pres: sg̲áwʼus
     sg̲áw+V+Bias+Interr+Past: sg̲áwʼujaa
     sg̲áw+V+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: sg̲áwʼuujaangaa
     sg̲áw+V+Bias+Interr+Fut: sg̲áwäsaaʼus
     sg̲áw+V+Cert+Fut: sg̲áwäsaaʼahlans
     sg̲áw+V+Fut+Rflx+Interr: sg̲áwäseehl
     sg̲áw+V+Pl+Impv: sg̲áwʼuu
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Imm+Pres: sg̲áwʼwaa
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: sg̲áwʼwaa
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Simp+Pres: sg̲áwʼwaang
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Dir+Past: sg̲áwʼwägan
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Interr+Past: sg̲áwʼaawaa
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Indir+Past: sg̲áwʼaawaan
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Rel: sg̲áwʼwaas
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Rel+Evid: sg̲áwʼaawaas
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+NonFact: sg̲áwʼwaa.ang
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Past+NonFact: sg̲áwʼaawaa.ang
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab: sg̲áwgangʼwaa
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Pres+Hab: sg̲áwgangʼwaang
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact: sg̲áwgangʼwaa.ang
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: sg̲áwʼwägiinii
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: sg̲áwʼwägaangaa
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: sg̲áwʼwägaangaan
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: sg̲áwʼwaaäsaa
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: sg̲áwʼwaaäs
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Simp+Fut: sg̲áwʼwaaäsaang
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Imm+Fut: sg̲áwʼwaaäsga
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Rel+Fut: sg̲áwʼwaaäsaas
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Fut+NonFact: sg̲áwʼwaaäsaa.ang
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: sg̲áwʼwaa.ang k̲asaʼáa
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Near+Fut: sg̲áwʼwaa.ang k̲asaʼáang
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: sg̲áwʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdláa
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+VNear+Fut: sg̲áwʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdláang
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: sg̲áwʼwaaʼuuj
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: sg̲áwʼwaaʼuujang
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Res: sg̲áwʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: sg̲áwʼwaaʼus
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: sg̲áwʼwaaʼujaa
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: sg̲áwʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: sg̲áwʼwaaäsaaʼus
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Cert+Pres: sg̲áwʼwaaʼahlanggang
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Cert+Past: sg̲áwʼwaaʼahlanggan
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: sg̲áwʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Cert+Fut: sg̲áwʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Cert+Rel: sg̲áwʼwaaʼahlans
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Ints+Past: sg̲áwʼaawaaʼahlang
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Cont: sg̲áwʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: sg̲áwʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Rflx: sg̲áwʼwaaʼahl
     sg̲áw+V+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: sg̲áwʼwaaäseehl
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Sg+Impv: sg̲áwʼang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Imm+Pres: sg̲áwʼangga
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Interr+Simp+Pres: sg̲áwʼang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Simp+Pres: sg̲áwʼanggang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Dir+Past: sg̲áwʼanggan
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Interr+Past: sg̲áwʼaangaa
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Indir+Past: sg̲áwʼaangaan
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Rel: sg̲áwʼans
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Rel+Evid: sg̲áwʼaangaas
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+NonFact: sg̲áwʼangang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Past+NonFact: sg̲áwʼaangaa.ang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Interr+Pres+Hab: sg̲áwʼanggang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Pres+Hab: sg̲áwgangʼanggang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Pres+Hab+NonFact: sg̲áwgangʼangang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Dir+Past+Hab: sg̲áwʼanggiinii
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Interr+Past+Hab: sg̲áwʼanggaangaa
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Indir+Past+Hab: sg̲áwʼanggaangaan
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Long: sg̲áwʼangäsaa
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Interr+Fut+Short: sg̲áwʼangäs
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Simp+Fut: sg̲áwʼangäsaang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Imm+Fut: sg̲áwʼangäsga
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Rel+Fut: sg̲áwʼangäsaas
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Fut+NonFact: sg̲áwʼangäsaa.ang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Interr+Near+Fut: sg̲áwang k̲asaaʼáng
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Near+Fut: sg̲áwang k̲asaaʼánggang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Interr+VNear+Fut: sg̲áwang k̲asaasdläʼáng
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+VNear+Fut: sg̲áwang k̲asaasdläʼánggang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Bias+Imm+Pres: sg̲áwʼangʼuuj
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Bias+Simp+Pres: sg̲áwʼangʼuujang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Res: sg̲áwʼangäsaaʼuujang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Pres: sg̲áwʼangʼus
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past: sg̲áwʼangʼujaa
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: sg̲áwʼangʼuujaangaa
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Bias+Interr+Fut: sg̲áwʼangäsaaʼus
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Cert+Pres: sg̲áwʼaangʼahlanggang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Cert+Past: sg̲áwʼaangʼahlanggan
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Cert+Past+Hab: sg̲áwʼaangʼahlanggiinii
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Cert+Fut: sg̲áwʼangäsaaʼahlans
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Cert+Rel: sg̲áwʼaangʼahlans
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Ints+Past: sg̲áwʼaangaaʼahlang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Cont: sg̲áwʼaangaaʼahlanggaa
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Ctfact+Pres: sg̲áwʼaangaaʼahlanggang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Rflx: sg̲áwʼaangʼahl
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Fut+Rflx+Interr: sg̲áwʼangäseehl
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+Pl+Impv: sg̲áwʼangʼuu
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Pres: sg̲áwʼangʼwaa
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Simp+Pres: sg̲áwʼangʼwaa
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Pres: sg̲áwʼangʼwaang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past: sg̲áwʼangʼwägan
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past: sg̲áwʼangʼaawaa
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past: sg̲áwʼangʼaawaan
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Rel: sg̲áwʼangʼwaas
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Evid: sg̲áwʼangʼaawaas
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+NonFact: sg̲áwʼangʼwaa.ang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Past+NonFact: sg̲áwʼangʼaawaa.ang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Pres+Hab: sg̲áwgangʼangʼwaa
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab: sg̲áwgangʼangʼwaang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Pres+Hab+NonFact: sg̲áwgangʼangʼwaa.ang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Dir+Past+Hab: sg̲áwʼangʼwägiinii
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Past+Hab: sg̲áwʼangʼwägaangaa
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Indir+Past+Hab: sg̲áwʼangʼwägaangaan
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Long: sg̲áwʼangʼwaaäsaa
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Fut+Short: sg̲áwʼangʼwaaäs
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Simp+Fut: sg̲áwʼangʼwaaäsaang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Imm+Fut: sg̲áwʼangʼwaaäsga
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Rel+Fut: sg̲áwʼangʼwaaäsaas
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+NonFact: sg̲áwʼangʼwaaäsaa.ang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+Near+Fut: sg̲áwʼwaa.ang k̲asaaʼáng
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Near+Fut: sg̲áwʼwaa.ang k̲asaaʼánggang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Interr+VNear+Fut: sg̲áwʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdläʼáng
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+VNear+Fut: sg̲áwʼwaa.ang k̲asaasdläʼánggang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Imm+Pres: sg̲áwʼangʼwaaʼuuj
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Simp+Pres: sg̲áwʼangʼwaaʼuujang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Res: sg̲áwʼangʼwaaäsaaʼuujang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Pres: sg̲áwʼangʼwaaʼus
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past: sg̲áwʼangʼwaaʼujaa
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Past+Hab: sg̲áwʼangʼwaaʼuujaangaa
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Bias+Interr+Fut: sg̲áwʼangʼwaaäsaaʼus
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Pres: sg̲áwʼangʼwaaʼahlanggang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past: sg̲áwʼangʼwaaʼahlanggan
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Past+Hab: sg̲áwʼangʼwaaʼahlanggiinii
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Fut: sg̲áwʼangʼwaaäsaaʼahlans
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Cert+Rel: sg̲áwʼangʼwaaʼahlans
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Ints+Past: sg̲áwʼangʼaawaaʼahlang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Cont: sg̲áwʼangʼaawaaʼahlanggaa
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Ctfact+Pres: sg̲áwʼangʼaawaaʼahlanggang
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Rflx: sg̲áwʼangʼwaaʼahl
     sg̲áw+V+Neg+3pl+Fut+Rflx+Interr: sg̲áwʼangʼwaaäseehl
